Washington statutes.
RCW 19.178.030

Notice—Recording—Procedure.

(1) A person conducting a going out of business sale shall record a notice of the sale with the county auditor at least fourteen days before the beginning date of the sale.

(2) The notice must be signed under oath and acknowledged and must require, and the person signing the notice shall set forth, the following facts and information regarding the sale:

(a) The name, address, telephone number, and Washington state business identification number of the owner of the merchandise to be sold. If the owner is a corporation, trust, unincorporated association, partnership, or other legal entity, the person signing the notice must be an officer of the entity and must identify his or her title;

(b) The name, address, and telephone number of the person who will be in charge and responsible for the conduct of the sale;

(c) The descriptive name, location or locations, and beginning and ending dates of the sale;

(d) Whether a person who has an ownership interest in the business or in the merchandise to be sold has conducted a going out of business sale within one year of recording the notice;

(e) Whether a person who has an ownership interest in the business or in the merchandise to be sold established or acquired an ownership interest in the business within six months of recording the notice; and

(f) A statement that:

(i) The merchandise ordered during the thirty days before recording the notice consists only of bona fide orders made in the usual course of business and does not contain merchandise taken on consignment or otherwise;

(ii) No merchandise transferred from an affiliated business was transferred in contemplation of conducting the sale;

(iii) No merchandise will be ordered, taken on consignment, or transferred from an affiliated business after the notice is recorded or during the sale;

(iv) No person who has an ownership interest in the business or in the merchandise to be sold established or acquired an interest in the business or in the merchandise to be sold solely or principally for the purpose of conducting a going out of business sale;

(v) The business will be discontinued after the ending date of the sale and no merchandise held out for sale will be subsequently offered for sale to the public by anyone who had an ownership interest in the business or in the merchandise offered for sale; and

(vi) No person who has an ownership interest in the business or in the merchandise to be sold is subject to a court order resulting from a civil enforcement action under the consumer protection act for a violation of this chapter or the type of conduct prohibited by this chapter.

[ 1993 c 456 s 5.]